District of Columbia statutes.
32-734

Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to contracts issued or renewed by health insurers on or after January 16, 2002.

June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-149, § 5, 49 DCR 4233
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 5 of Continuation of Health Coverage Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-108, April 13, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 4056).